Maine, session 132, LD1598.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §3360, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2009, c. 79, §2, is further
amended to read:
4. Eligible expenses and losses. "Eligible expenses and losses" means expenses and
losses resulting from a personal injury sustained by an individual as a direct result of a
crime specified in subsection 3 and may include medical and medically related expenses,
psychological or mental health counseling expenses, lost wages, funeral, burial and other
homicide-related expenses and travel expenses and loss of income of a claimant or family
member for providing or obtaining care for the personal injury of a minor or incapacitated
victim. "Eligible expenses and losses" may include costs of eyeglasses, hearing aids,
dentures or other prosthetic devices taken, lost, destroyed or damaged as a result of the
crime, costs to repair, replace or install locks or security devices, costs of crime scene
cleanup and security deposits relocation expenses. Expenses and losses claimed under this
subsection must be expenses or losses actually and reasonably incurred.
Page 1 - 132LR2014(03)